New York, session 2025-2026, S8611.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The state civil service commission shall amend 4 NYCRR 2 28-1.3 to provide that state employees designated managerial or confi- 3 dential and subject to the attendance rules of the state of New York 4 shall be credited with sick leave at the rate of 13 days per year, 5 effective with the first biweekly administration and institutional 6 payroll periods following April 1, 2026. All such full-time employees 7 shall earn sick leave at the rate of 3.75 or 4 hours per biweekly 8 payroll period, based on whether they occupy a 37.5 or 40 hour per week 9 position, respectively. Such employees shall be eligible to accrue 225 10 days of sick leave credits. Such employees shall be eligible to be 11 granted and use sick leave at half-pay upon the exhaustion of their sick 12 leave accruals. The cumulative total of all sick leave at half-pay 13 granted to an eligible employee during their state service shall not 14 exceed one payroll period for each completed six months of state 15 service. Employees currently enrolled in the state of New York M/C 16 Income Protection Plan (IPP) shall have a one-time voluntary option to 17 remain in the IPP. Such employees affirmatively opting to remain in the 18 IPP shall instead be credited with sick leave at the rate of 4 days for 19 every six-month period, not to exceed 8 days over 12 consecutive months. 20 A decision to remain in the IPP shall be irrevocable. Employees hired or 21 promoted into a position designated managerial or confidential shall 22 have a one-time voluntary option to join the IPP. A decision to enroll 23 in the IPP is irrevocable. Such employees affirmatively opting to newly 24 enroll in the IPP shall instead be credited with sick leave at the rate EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11977-02-5 S. 8611 2 1 of 4 days for every six-month period, not to exceed 8 days over 12 2 consecutive months. 3 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall be deemed to 4 have been in full force and effect on and after April 1, 2026.